North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-52 Public Employees Retirement System

54-52-01.
Definition of terms.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Account balance” means the total contributions made by the employee, vested employer contributions under section 54-52-11.1, the vested portion of the vesting fund as of June 30, 1977, and interest credited thereon at the rate established by the board.

“Beneficiary” means any person in receipt of a benefit provided by this plan or any person designated by a participating member to receive benefits.

“Correctional officer” means a participating member who is employed as a correctional officer by a political subdivision.

“Eligible employee” means all permanent employees who meet all of the eligibility requirements set by this chapter and who are eighteen years or more of age, and includes appointive and elective officials under sections 54-52-02.5, 54-52-02.11, and 54-52-02.12, and nonteaching employees of the superintendent of public instruction, including the superintendent of public instruction, who elect to transfer from the teachers’ fund for retirement to the public employees retirement system under section 54-52-02.13, and employees of the state board for career and technical education who elect to transfer from the teachers’ fund for retirement to the public employees retirement system under section 54-52-02.14. Eligible employee does not include nonclassified state employees who elect to become members of the retirement plan established under chapter 54-52.6 but does include employees of the judicial branch and employees of the board of higher education and state institutions under the jurisdiction of the board.

“Employee” means any individual employed by a governmental unit, whose compensation is paid out of the governmental unit’s funds, or funds controlled or administered by a governmental unit, or paid by the federal government through any of its executive or administrative officials; licensed employees of a school district means those employees eligible to participate in the teachers’ fund for retirement who, except under subsection 2 of section 54-52-17.2, are not eligible employees under this chapter.

“Employer” means a governmental unit.

“Firefighter” means a participating member who is employed as a firefighter by a political subdivision and, notwithstanding subsection 13, for an individual employed after July 31, 2017, is employed at least thirty-two hours per week and at least twenty weeks each year of employment. A firefighter who is a participating member of the law enforcement retirement plan created by this chapter who begins employment after July 31, 2017, is ineligible to participate concurrently in any other retirement plan administered by the public employees retirement system. The term does not include a firefighter employee of the North Dakota national guard.

“Funding agent” or “agents” means an investment firm, trust bank, or other financial institution which the retirement board may select to hold and invest the employers’ and members’ contributions.

“Governmental unit” means the state of North Dakota, except the highway patrol for members of the retirement plan created under chapter 39-03.1, or a participating political subdivision thereof.

“National guard security officer or firefighter” means a participating member who is:

A security police employee of the North Dakota national guard; or

A firefighter employee of the North Dakota national guard.

“Participating member” means an eligible employee who through payment into the plan has established a claim against the plan.

“Peace officer” means a participating member who is a peace officer as defined in section 12-63-01 and is employed as a peace officer by the bureau of criminal investigation or by a political subdivision and, notwithstanding subsection 13, for persons employed after August 1, 2005, is employed thirty-two hours or more per week and at least twenty weeks each year of employment. A peace officer who is a participating member of the law enforcement retirement plan created by this chapter who begins employment after August 1, 2005, is ineligible to participate concurrently in any other retirement plan administered by the public employees retirement system.

“Permanent employee” means a governmental unit employee whose services are not limited in duration and who is filling an approved and regularly funded position in an eligible governmental unit, and is employed twenty hours or more per week and at least twenty weeks each year of employment.

“Prior service” means service or employment before July 1, 1966.

“Prior service credit” means such credit toward a retirement benefit as the retirement board may determine under the provisions of this chapter.

“Public employees retirement system” means the retirement plan and program established by this chapter.

“Retirement” means the acceptance of a retirement allowance under this chapter upon either termination of employment or termination of participation in the retirement plan.

“Retirement board” or “board” means the governing authority created under section 54-52-03.

“Seasonal employee” means a participating member who does not work twelve months a year.

“Service” means employment on or after July 1, 1966.

“Service benefit” means the credit toward retirement benefits as determined by the retirement board under the provisions of this chapter

“Temporary employee” means a governmental unit employee who is not eligible to participate as a permanent employee, who is at least eighteen years old and not actively contributing to another employer-sponsored pension fund, and, if employed by a school district, occupies a noncertified teacher’s position.

“Wages” and “salaries” means the member’s earnings in eligible employment under this chapter reported as salary on the member’s federal income tax withholding statements plus any salary reduction or salary deferral amounts under 26 U.S.C. 125, 401(k), 403(b), 414(h), or 457. “Salary” does not include fringe benefits such as payments for unused sick leave, personal leave, vacation leave paid in a lump sum, overtime, housing allowances, transportation expenses, early retirement incentive pay, severance pay, medical insurance, workforce safety and insurance benefits, disability insurance premiums or benefits, or salary received by a member in lieu of previously employer-provided fringe benefits under an agreement between the member and participating employer. Bonuses may be considered as salary under this section if reported and annualized pursuant to rules adopted by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 1; 1969, ch. 456, § 4; 1969, ch. 457, § 3; 1971, ch. 515, § 1; 1973, ch. 120, § 60; 1973, ch. 246, §§ 4 to 6; 1977, ch. 499, § 1; 1979, ch. 570, § 1; 1979, ch. 572, § 2; 1981, ch. 545, § 1; 1983, ch. 572, § 1; 1983, ch. 573, § 1; 1985, ch. 222, § 4; R.M. disapproved December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740; S.L. 1989, ch. 662, § 1; 1989, ch. 663, § 1; 1989, ch. 664, § 1; 1991, ch. 626, § 2; 1993, ch. 532, § 1; 1995, ch. 527, § 1; 1995, ch. 528, § 1; 1995, ch. 529, § 1; 1999, ch. 162, § 46; 1999, ch. 478, § 1; 1999, ch. 482, § 1; 2003, ch. 34, § 15; 2003, ch. 497, § 1; 2003, ch. 498, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 531, § 7; 2007, ch. 483, § 2; 2009, ch. 512, § 1; 2013, ch. 431, § 4; 2015, ch. 56, § 4, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 57, § 12, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 372, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 379, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 56, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 431, S.L. 2013 becomes effective October 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 54-52-01 was amended 3 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 372, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2053; Section 1 of Chapter 379, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1148; and Section 12 of Chapter 57, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1043.

Section 19 of chapter 431, S.L. 2013 provides in part:

“EXPIRATION DATE — SUSPENSION.

Sections 4, 12, and 14 of this Act are effective through July 31, 2017, and after that date are ineffective.”

Collateral References.

Disciplinary suspension of public employee as affecting computation of length of service for retirement or pension purposes, 6 A.L.R.2d 506.

Rights and liabilities as between employer and employee with respect to general pension or retirement plan, 42 A.L.R.2d 461, 471.

Vested right of pensioner to pension, 52 A.L.R.2d 437.

Retroactive change in rate of employee’s contribution to public pension fund, validity of, 78 A.L.R.2d 1197.

Relationship between performance of official duties and subsequent disability or death for purpose of pension or survivorship benefits of government employee other than fireman, policeman, or military personnel, 85 A.L.R.2d 1048.

Heirs: rights in survival benefits under public pension or retirement plan as between designated beneficiary and heirs, legatees or personal representative of deceased employee, 5 A.L.R.3d 644.

Right to unemployment compensation as affected by receipt of pension, 56 A.L.R.3d 520.

Mandatory retirement of public officer or employee based on age, 81 A.L.R.3d 811.

Employee retirement pension benefits as exempt from garnishment, attachment, levy, execution, or similar proceedings, 93 A.L.R.3d 711.

Validity of statutory classifications based on population — governmental employee salary or pension statutes, 96 A.L.R.3d 538.

What constitutes “salary,” “wages,” “pay,” or the like, within pension law basing benefits thereon, 91 A.L.R.5th 225.

54-52-02.
Formulation of plan — Exclusion of employees covered by plans in existence.

All departments, boards, institutions, commissions, or agencies of the state of North Dakota, the Garrison Diversion Conservancy District, district health units, the supreme court, and the district courts, hereinafter referred to as agency, shall participate in a retirement system which will provide for the payment of benefits to state and political subdivision employees or to their beneficiaries thereby enabling the employees to care for themselves and their dependents and which by its provisions will improve state and political subdivision employment, reduce excessive personnel turnover, and offer career employment to high-grade men and women. However, a city health department providing health services in a city-county health district formed under chapter 23-35 is not required to participate in the public employees retirement system but may participate in the public employees retirement system under section 54-52-02.1. Employees presently covered by a pension plan or retirement plan to which the state is contributing, except social security, are not eligible for duplicate coverage except as provided under sections 39-03.1-14.1 and 54-52-17.2.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 2; 1971, ch. 515, § 2; 1973, ch. 246, § 7; R.M. disapproved December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740; 1989, ch. 665, § 1; 1999, ch. 242, § 5; 2003, ch. 498, § 3.

Cross-References.

Judges’ retirement, see N.D. Const., Art. VI, § 12; N.D.C.C. ch. 27-17.

54-52-02.1.
Political subdivisions authorized to join public employees retirement system.

A political subdivision may, on behalf of its permanent employees, on behalf of its peace officers, firefighters, and correctional officers separately from its other employees, and permanent noncertified employees only in the case of school districts, enter agreements with the retirement board for the purpose of extending the benefits of the public employees retirement system, as provided in this chapter, to those employees. The agreement may, in accordance with this chapter, contain provisions relating to benefits, contributions, effective date, modification, administration, and other appropriate provisions as the retirement board and the political subdivision agree upon, but the agreement must provide:

The political subdivision will contribute on behalf of each eligible employee an amount equal to that provided in section 54-52-06 or 54-52-06.3 for peace officers, firefighters, and correctional officers participating separately from other political subdivision employees.

A portion of the moneys paid by the political subdivision may be used to pay administrative expenses of the retirement board.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a political subdivision having an existing police or firefighter pension plan may merge that plan into the public employees retirement system under rules adopted by and in a manner determined by the board.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a political subdivision of this state not currently participating in the public employees retirement system may not become a participant in the retirement system until an actuarial study is performed under the direction of the board to calculate the required employer contribution for any past service liability and the required employer contribution must be an amount determined sufficient to amortize and fund any past service liability over a period not to exceed thirty years as determined by the board. Any fees incurred in performing the actuarial study must be paid for by the political subdivision in a manner determined by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 456, § 1; 1969, ch. 457, § 1; 1971, ch. 516, § 1; 1977, ch. 499, § 2; 1979, ch. 571, § 1; 1981, ch. 545, § 2; R.M. disapproved December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740; S.L. 1989, ch. 665, § 2; 1995, ch. 528, § 2; 2003, ch. 497, § 2; 2011, ch. 431, § 5; 2017, ch. 379, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

54-52-02.2.
Employee referendum — Authorization and supervision.

On their own motion or upon petition by twenty percent of the permanent political subdivision employees or the permanent noncertified employees of any school district, the political subdivision shall authorize and supervise a referendum of the permanent employees employed by that political subdivision on the question whether the employees elect to participate in the retirement system. If the majority of the employees vote in favor of participation in the retirement system, the political subdivision, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in chapter 40-46, may in its discretion enter into the agreement provided for in section 54-52-02.1. Notwithstanding provisions to the contrary in chapters 18-05, 18-11, and 40-45, the police department of any city, the fire department of any city, or both, may hold referendums among their employees on the question of whether their department should join the remaining city employees in participation in the retirement system established by this chapter. If a majority of the city police or city firefighters, or both, vote in favor of such participation, the governing body of the city must include the police and firefighters within any agreement entered into pursuant to section 54-52-02.1 and must arrange for discontinuance of any existing police or firefighters’ pension fund as provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 456, § 2; 1969, ch. 457, § 2; 1977, ch. 499, § 3; 1995, ch. 528, § 3.

54-52-02.3.
Newly elected supreme and district court judges.

After July 1, 1973, any person elected or appointed to the office of judge of the supreme court or judge of the district court for the first time must, from and after the date that person qualifies and takes office, be a participating member of the public employees retirement system. Any person so elected or appointed is not eligible for membership in or for receipt of benefits from the retirement program provided by chapter 27-17. As used in this section, the phrase “for the first time” means a person elected or appointed, who, after July 1, 1973, does not hold office as a judge of the supreme court or the district court at the time of the person’s election or appointment.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 246, § 1; 1977, ch. 499, § 4.

54-52-02.4.
Participation by certain employees — Requirements. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 651, § 1.

54-52-02.5.
Newly elected and appointed state officials.

After December 31, 1999, a person elected or appointed to a state office for the first time must, from and after the date that person qualifies and takes office, be a participating member of the public employees retirement system unless that person makes an election at any time during the first six months after the date the person takes office to participate in the retirement plan established under chapter 54-52.6. As used in this section, the phrase “for the first time” means a person appointed, who, after December 31, 1999, does not hold office as an appointed official at the time of that person’s appointment.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 572, § 1; 1999, ch. 482, § 2; 2003, ch. 498, § 4.

54-52-02.6.
Repurchase of past service upon reemployment.

An individual who terminates participation in the plan may elect to receive a refund of the member’s account balance under subsection 7 of section 54-52-17 and thus forfeit all rights under the retirement plan. An individual upon re-employment may elect to repurchase the forfeited past service for retirement and the retiree health benefits program in accordance with rules established by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 546, § 1; 1987, ch. 652, § 1; 1989, ch. 666, § 1; 1991, ch. 627, § 1; 1993, ch. 532, § 2.

54-52-02.7.
Purchase of service by former employees of mental health and retardation centers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 651, § 1.

54-52-02.8.
Purchase of service. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 651, § 1.

54-52-02.9.
Participation by temporary employees.

Within one hundred eighty days of beginning employment, a temporary employee may elect to participate in the public employees retirement system and receive credit for service after enrollment. Monthly, the temporary employee shall pay to the fund an amount equal to eight and twelve-hundredths percent times the temporary employee’s present monthly salary. The amount required to be paid by a temporary employee increases by two percent times the temporary employee’s present monthly salary beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2012, and with an additional two percent increase, beginning with the reporting period of January 2013, and with an additional increase of two percent, beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2014.

If the temporary employee first enrolled:

Before January 1, 2020, in addition the temporary employee shall pay the required monthly contribution to the retiree health benefit fund established under section 54-52.1-03.2. This contribution must be recorded as a member contribution pursuant to section 54-52.1-03.2.

After December 31, 2019, the temporary employee shall pay to the fund an additional amount equal to one and fourteen-hundredths percent times the temporary employee’s present monthly salary.

An employer may not pay the temporary employee’s contributions. A temporary employee may continue to participate as a temporary employee in the public employees retirement system until termination of employment or reclassification of the temporary employee as a permanent employee. A temporary employee may not purchase any additional credit, including additional credit under section 54-52-17.4 or past service under section 54-52-02.6.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 664, § 2; 1991, ch. 630, § 3; 2007, ch. 482, § 6; 2009, ch. 513, § 1; 2011, ch. 432, § 3; 2013, ch. 431, § 5; 2019, ch. 459, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 431, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

54-52-02.10.
Members of the legislative assembly. [Repealed]

Deleted by R.M. December 5, 1989.

Note.

Section 54-52-02.10 was enacted by S.L. 1989, ch. 223, § 5, and disapproved by R.M. December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740.

54-52-02.11.
Participation requirements for nonstate elected officials.

Elected officials of participating counties, at their individual option, may enroll in the defined benefit plan within the first six months of their term.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 498, § 5.

54-52-02.12.
Participation requirements for nonstate appointed officials.

Nonstate appointed officials of participating employers appointed on or after August 1, 1999, who meet the participation requirements of this chapter must be enrolled in the defined benefit plan effective within the first month of taking office.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 498, § 6.

54-52-02.13.
Participation by nonteaching employees of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, between July 1, 2003, and five p.m. on August 29, 2003, a nonteaching employee of the superintendent of public instruction, including the superintendent of public instruction, who is otherwise eligible to participate in the public employees retirement system may file an election with the staff of the retirement and investment office to transfer from the teachers’ fund for retirement to the public employees retirement system. The teachers’ fund for retirement shall certify the employees who are eligible to transfer. An election to transfer is irrevocable for as long as the employee remains employed with the superintendent of public instruction. The teachers’ fund for retirement shall certify a transferring employee’s salary, service credit, contribution history, account balance, and any other necessary information to the public employees retirement system. The amount to be transferred is the greater of the actuarial present value of the employee’s accrued benefit as of July 1, 2003, plus interest at the rate of seven and one-half percent from July 1, 2003, until the date the amount is transferred to the public employees retirement system or the employee’s account balance as of the date of transfer. The public employees retirement system shall credit the transferring employee with the service credit specified by the teachers’ fund for retirement and shall convert the annual salary history from the teachers’ fund for retirement to a monthly salary for the period. An employee becomes a member of the public employees retirement system as of the date the funds are transferred. To be eligible to transfer, an employee must be employed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction at the date of the transfer. The superintendent of public instruction shall begin making retirement contributions, and the public employees retirement system shall begin receiving those retirement contributions, on behalf of employees who have elected to transfer to the public employees retirement system to that system the first of the month following the date of transfer.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 34, § 16.

54-52-02.14.
Participation by employees of the state board for career and technical education.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, between July 1, 2007, and five p.m. on August 31, 2007, an employee of the state board for career and technical education who is otherwise eligible to participate in the public employees retirement system may file an election with the staff of the retirement and investment office to transfer from the teachers’ fund for retirement to the public employees retirement system. The teachers’ fund for retirement shall certify the employees who are eligible to transfer. An election to transfer is irrevocable for as long as the employee remains employed with the state board for career and technical education. The teachers’ fund for retirement shall certify a transferring employee’s salary, service credit, contribution history, account balance, and any other necessary information to the public employees retirement system. The amount to be transferred is the greater of the actuarial present value of the employee’s accrued benefit as of July 1, 2007, plus interest at the rate of seven and one-half percent from July 1, 2007, until the date the amount is transferred to the public employees retirement system or the employee’s account balance on the date of transfer. The public employees retirement system shall credit the transferring employee with the service credit specified by the teachers’ fund for retirement and shall convert the annual salary history from the teachers’ fund for retirement to a monthly salary for the period. An employee becomes a member of the public employees retirement system as of the date the funds are transferred. To be eligible to transfer, an employee must be employed by the state board for career and technical education on the date of the transfer. The state board for career and technical education shall begin making retirement contributions, and the public employees retirement system shall begin receiving those retirement contributions, on behalf of employees who have elected to transfer to the public employees retirement system to that system the first of the month following the date of transfer.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 483, § 3.

54-52-03.
Governing authority.

A state agency is hereby created to constitute the governing authority of the system to consist of a board of nine individuals known as the retirement board. No more than one elected member of the board may be in the employ of a single department, institution, or agency of the state or in the employ of a political subdivision. An employee of the public employees retirement system or the state retirement and investment office may not serve on the board.

Two members of the legislative assembly must be appointed by the chairman of the legislative management to serve on the board.

If the same political party has the greatest number of members in both the house and senate, one member must be from that majority party and one member from the political party with the next greatest number of members in the house and senate.

If the same political party does not have the greatest number of members in both the house and senate, one member must be from the majority party in the house and one member must be from the majority party in the senate.

One member of the board must be appointed by the governor to serve a term of five years. The appointee must be a North Dakota citizen who is not a state or political subdivision employee and who by experience is familiar with money management. The citizen member is chairman of the board.

One member of the board must be appointed by the attorney general from the attorney general’s legal staff and shall serve a term of five years.

The state health officer appointed under section 23-01-05 or the state health officer’s designee is a member of the board.

Three board members must be elected by and from among the active participating members, members of the retirement plan established under chapter 54-52.6, members of the retirement plan established under chapter 39-03.1, and members of the job service North Dakota retirement plan. Employees who have terminated their employment for whatever reason are not eligible to serve as elected members of the board under this subsection. Board members must be elected to a five-year term pursuant to an election called by the board. Notice of board elections must be given to all active participating members. The time spent in performing duties as a board member may not be charged against any employee’s accumulated annual or any other type of leave.

One board member must be elected by and from among those individuals who are receiving retirement benefits under this chapter. The board shall call the election and must give prior notice of the election to the individuals eligible to participate in the election pursuant to this subsection. The board member shall serve a term of five years.

The members of the board are entitled to receive one hundred forty-eight dollars per day compensation and necessary mileage and travel expenses as provided in sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09. This is in addition to any other pay or allowance due the chairman or a member, plus an allowance for expenses they may incur through service on the board.

A board member shall serve a five-year term and until the board member’s successor qualifies. Each board member is entitled to one vote, and five of the nine board members constitute a quorum. Five votes are necessary for resolution or action by the board at any meeting.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 3; 1967, ch. 395, § 1; 1969, ch. 456, § 5; 1969, ch. 457, § 4; 1975, ch. 489, § 1; 1977, ch. 499, § 6; 1985, ch. 580, § 1; 1989, ch. 663, § 2; 1993, ch. 532, § 3; 1997, ch. 432, § 29; 2009, ch. 514, § 7; 2011, ch. 48, § 6; 2011, 431, § 6; 2015, ch. 56, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 56, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

54-52-04.
Board authority.

The board shall adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter, and to manage the system, subject to the limitations of this chapter. The board has the powers and privileges of a corporation, including the right to sue and be sued in its own name as the board. The venue of all actions in which the board is a party must be Burleigh County, North Dakota.

The board shall appoint an executive director to serve at its discretion. The executive director shall perform such duties as assigned by the board.

The board shall authorize the creation of whatever staff it deems necessary for sound and economical administration of the system. The executive director shall hire the staff, subject to the approval of the board.

The board shall arrange for actuarial and medical advisers for the system. The board shall cause a qualified, competent actuary to be retained on a consulting basis. The actuary shall make an annual valuation of the liabilities and reserves of the system and a determination of the contributions required by the system to discharge its liabilities and pay the administrative costs under this chapter, and to recommend to the board rates of employer and employee contributions required, based upon the entry age normal cost method, to maintain the system on an actuarial reserve basis; once every five years make a general investigation of the actuarial experience under the system including mortality, retirement, employment turnover, and other items required by the board, and recommend actuarial tables for use in valuations and in calculating actuarial equivalent values based on such investigation; and perform other duties as may be assigned by the board.

The state shall provide the board with the retirement systems office or offices to be used for the meetings of the board and for the general purposes of the administrative personnel.

The funds necessary for paying prior service and service benefits, consultant fees, and making withdrawal payments and refunds are hereby appropriated from the retirement fund for those purposes. The amount necessary to pay the consulting fees and insurance benefits related to the uniform group insurance program is hereby appropriated from the insurance premiums received by the board.

The board shall administer chapters 39-03.1, 54-52.1, and 54-52.2, and may administer other optional employee benefit programs, including a flexible benefits plan, an optional employee short-term disability plan, a long-term care plan, or other optional employee benefit programs as the board deems appropriate. The board shall also administer the retirement plan established in 1961 and frozen to new entrants in 1980 for employees of job service North Dakota under chapter 52-11.

The board shall annually report the investment performance of the fund and distribute a copy to each participant.

The board may distribute the employer contribution and applicable interest for any employee of any development foundation associated with a public institution of higher education in this state who may previously have been included in the public employees retirement system while employed by such foundation. Such employee is entitled to have that employee’s contribution and the contribution of the development foundation, with interest.

The board may audit any books, papers, accounts, bills, vouchers, and other documents or property of any and all departments, boards, commissions, political subdivisions, financial institutions, contractors, health care organizations, and consultants relating to their participation in services provided to programs administered by the board.

The board shall fund the administrative expenses of chapter 54-52.2 from funds collected under chapters 54-52, 54-52.1, and 54-52.3 and from fines and fees collected from deferred compensation services providers, including any fees paid for by participant funds, subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly.

Except as provided by section 54-52-17.7, the board may adjust service and make any correction of member, retiree, or beneficiary records and benefits after an error or inequity has been determined.

The board may use any amount credited to the separate uniform group insurance program fund created by section 54-52.1-06 in excess of the costs of administration of the uniform group insurance program to reduce the amount of premium amounts paid monthly by enrolled members of the uniform group insurance program, to reduce any increase in premium amounts paid monthly by enrolled members, or to provide increased insurance coverage to the members, as the board may determine.

The board may create and implement an Internal Revenue Code section 115 trust health care savings plan for all supreme and district court judges participating in the public employees retirement system if seventy-five percent of the total active participating supreme and district court judges vote to approve the program. If approved, the contribution level specified in the vote applies to all current and future participating supreme and district court judges and must be paid pursuant to the plan document developed by the board. The contribution level may only be changed by a vote of seventy-five percent of the total active participating supreme and district court judges at that time.

The board shall establish policies and implement procedures to make and collect payments in the most cost-effective manner, including the use of electronic transfer of funds.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 4; 1967, ch. 395, § 2; 1969, ch. 456, § 6; 1969, ch. 457, § 5; 1971, ch. 517, § 11; 1975, ch. 490, § 1; 1977, ch. 499, § 7; 1983, ch. 419, § 3; 1985, ch. 285, § 3; 1985, ch. 581, § 1; 1987, ch. 653, § 1; 1989, ch. 662, § 2; 1989, ch. 667, § 11; 1991, ch. 628, § 4; 1991, ch. 629, § 1; 1993, ch. 532, § 4; 1995, ch. 527, § 2; 1995, ch. 533, § 1; 1999, ch. 113, § 19; 2001, ch. 494, § 1; 2001, ch. 496, § 1; 2003, ch. 447, § 2; 2009, ch. 515, § 1; 2013, ch. 432, § 3; 2017, ch. 22, § 11, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 432, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Cross-References.

Investment and disbursement of moneys of retiree health benefits fund and administrative expenditures, see N.D.C.C. § 54-52.1-03.2.

Uniform group insurance program for state employees, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-52.1.